RAFAEL:
OR,
THE TWICE CONDEMNED.
A Tale of Key West.
BY PROFESSOR INGRAHAM.
[Entered according to act of Congress, in the year 1845, by H. L., Williams, in the
Clerk's office of the District Court of the District of Massachusetts.
CHAPTER I.
THE ARMED SCHOONER.
It
was towards the close of a summery afternoon in October, 1840, that the
U. S. schooner of war, Dolphin, was riding at anchor in the port of Key-West.
Around her were several ships, brigs and schooners which a gale of the
preceding
night had driven in for shelter. One of them was the packet ship on
which I had taken passage sixteen days before at New York for New Orleans;
and as she had lost her fore-topmast and received some other injuries which it
would take some days to repair, I accepted the invitation of the lieutenant
commanding the armed schooner to take a three days cruise with him across
the channel to Cuba.
I had therefore dined with him on the day in which my story opens, and was
now his guest. We were seated upon the taffrail enjoying a cigar and
watching
in contemplative silence the golden sunset, which at that season in that
latitude is ever gorgeous, when a midshipman who was idly lolling over the
quarter gazing seaward, turned to the commander and said,
`I have had my eye on that ship standin' in, sir, for some time. She acts
queer!'
We followed the direction of his gaze and observed about six miles out a
large ship under press of sail standing for the post. She had everything set she
could carry,studdenstails a-wing and sky-sails aloft. While we were looking
at her she broached to, and seemed about to wear, and then filled away again
and stood on. As the wind was on her quarter, her lee studden-sails were
constantly
flapping or else set back, while her starboard sails kept full.
`That is the way she has been rearing and hauling, noddin' and bobbin' this
ten minutes, sir,' said the reefer, nodding and bobbing his own head by way of illustration.
The commander took his glass and placed it to his eye. For fall a minute
he looked at her steadily, and then said,
`That fellow is making for harbor with his best foot foremost; and the way
he works his vessel I should think he was ignorant of the way to come in, and
was feeling it as he went, yet too much in a hurry to spare an inch of his
canvass
.
He is, too, running into danger, if he did but know it if he keeps that
course. Why in the deuce dont the fellow take in his larboard and
studden-sails
?
There is smoke and a flash! Hark, a gun!
`A signal for a pilot, I expect, sir,' answered the middy.
`They don't call pilots that way here, Fred,' responded the commander to
the lad with a smile. `Besides there is one standing out after her and is now
within two miles of her! There goes another gun!'
`And the pilot boat has tacked and putting back to harbor!' I said seeing
with surprise this movement; for I held a glass in my hand, by aid of which I
could see clearly both the boat and the ship; the latter being now about five
miles off.
`So she has and is scudding with a free sheet right before the wind,
homeward
.'
`And there goes another gun, sir,' exclaimed the middy.
`Yes, and if another is fired, they are minute-guns. Stand by to slip the
cable and make sail; for if she fires again, I shall run out and see what is the
matter.'
`There she yaws again nearly broadside too, sir,' said the next officer in
command, a passed midshipman, who came up from below on hearing the first
gun fired.
`And now I can see her colorsAmericanunion down in her rigging!'
exclaimed the commander.
`And there is a fourth gun,' cried the middy looking at his captain to catch
his eye, and in an attitude of one ready to spring forward to obey the
expected
order.
`They are
minute guns!
Get the schooner under her canvass at once, Mr
Ferris,' called the lieutenant in command to the passed midshipman. Slip the
cable! Loose the foretopsail and set her jibs. Some of you aft here to the
main halyards. Lively men, lively!'
While he was giving his various orders in an animated tone, I was
engaged
in looking at the ship with my glass, when I became all at once interested
in what appeared to be a new and unusual set of sails unfolding themselves to
view over her stern. But gradually I saw them develope themselves into the
outlines of a gib, fore-sail, top-sail, top-gallant-sail; then slowly appeared a
main-gaft-top-sail, and the proportions of a huge main-sail the next instant
followed; and, passing out of range of the ship, astern of, and behind which
it had hitherto hidden, stood visibly forth the rakish hull and top-hamper of a
`long, low, black schooner!'
My exclamation of surprise drew the young commander to my side.
`What is it?'
`A vessel in chace, I believe!'
`So there isa rascally pirate or may I never see Boston!' he exclaimed as
soon as he levelled his glass! Now my boys stir yourselves!' Uncle Sam
expects
every man and boy to help catch that black hawk and pick his feathers.
It is the very cruiser I have heard of, as skulking about Cape Antonia three
weeks ago, and which I have wished to fall in with. She is not half a mile
astern of the ship, and unless we are lively she will board her right before our
nose. Yesthat fellow is no better than he should be,' added the lieutenant
taking a long and close survey of the vessel through his glass. She is a
regular
buccaneer, and if her skipper will only wait outside there until I can come
up within hail of him, I will make him a present of my next twelve month's
pay. But I fear that as soon as he discovers that there is one of brother
Jonathan's
bull dogs in the harbor and we are in motion he will cut and run. It is
strange we did not discover him. But the rascal kept purposely astern, and
the ship I have now no doubt, yawed as she did to give us a chance of looking
at her enemy and coming to help her.'
We were now underweigh, having slipped the cable and floated it by a buoy
so that we should know where to find it again when we returned to port. The
moment we had any headway on the vessel, a gun was fired forward in answer
to the signals. The wind was blowing from the south a little westerly, and
about a six knot breeze; but by laying our course strait out of the harbor on
a bowline, we could fetch the ship without tacking. The ship kept firing at
intervals of a minute, her signals of distress, that produced by their solemn
and irregular sound associations in my mind similar to those created by the
knoll of the funeral bell. The ship seemed to me to be an animated creature,
and the signal cannon, her voice, appealing to man for succor. Her motions,
her irregular progress, were like life, and like living actions under the
influence
of terror. I felt a sympathy for her as I should have done for a human
being. The black schooner too, crouching low upon the waves seemed to be
a living animalsome subtle beast of prey hunting its victim. And to any
one witnessing such a scene as thiswitnessing the helpless efforts of the
one to escape and the sullen advances of the other to make captive; these as
sociations would irreverently press upon the mind.
The war-schooner upon whose deck we stood, was now gliding swiftly
towards
the scene of peril. She carried eight eighteens besides a heavy forty
two pounder upon the forecastle. The decks were cleared for action as soon
as we had got sail on her; ports thrown open; the tompions removed from the
muzzles; cartridges passed up from the magazine; balls, cannister, and grape,
piled near each gun upon deck; and forward, the huge globes of iron, which
were to fill the cavernous jaws of the forty-two, were placed in sockets by the
brush.
In the meanwhile the ship was crowding on all sail, and was four miles only
out; and she was now making better speed, inasmuch, as soon as she heard
our answering gun, she had taken in her studdensails, which had been
retarding
her progress instead of helping her flight.
The schooner, was however close upon her and had began to fire at her at
intervals, no doubt resolved to do her an injury if she could not capture her.
`That fellow has kept from firing upon her before, lest he should wake us
up:' said the lieutenant who was pacing up and down the quarter deck in fine
spirits; `but now that she has been firing powder for help, he has thought it
folly to keep silence. That he wont keep the course he is steering now long
after he discovers to his satisfaction who we are, you may be assured. There
goes the ship's mizzen royal carried away by a shot. The fellow is a good
gunner; but let me bring the Dolphin within half a mile of him, and I will
show him how to play at billiards and pocket the ball! Ah, see that!'
The schooner after firing the last mischievous gun suddenly luffed up into
the wind, close-hauled every sheet, showed a green flag and stood seaward
under
a press of sail.
`Was I not right!' cried my friend, the commander, rubbing his hands with
great glee, his fine dark eyes, sparkling like stars, and his face glowing with
hope and confidence.
`He is running away, sir,' said the middy, with a look of chagrin, `and I
am afraid we shant catch him! These chaps have such long legs!'
`And so has the Dolphin long fins! We shall come along side of that rogue,
confound him, before morning, and you shall have the pleasure Fred of playing
commodore in her cabin, and take her into port.'
`If I thought so, I should feel better, but I am afraid he'll skulk away! See
sir, how he runs! From here, without a glass, I can see the white bone he
carries in his teeth, and the foaming wake he makes after.'
`Yes he sails like a bird on the wing. He has found out who we are, for
the smoke of the ships firing I have no doubt kept him from making us out
distinctly
,
especially as there were so many craft anchored about us with which
we were blended. But as soon, you saw, as we began to get down the harbor
in full sight he put about and run for it.'
`There goes a gun from the ship, and by the report it was shotted,' said the
officer of the deck coming aft. `They are firing at the schooner now she is
frightened off.'
`Yes. That is the way with these merchant-men,' answered Wordley, the
young captain, with a smile. `Her signal guns were not shotted, and so I
supposed he had no balls on board. But he was afraid to strike, and like a
cowardly school boy, contented himself with giving loud calls for help; and
then as soon as he leaves him, driven away by a more fearful antagonist, he
throws stones at his back. But never mind, the courage or cowardice of the
merchantman has nothing to do with the matter I have in hand. Catch that
fellow I will before another twenty-four hours are passed over my head.'
In about fifteen minutes we came so near the chase as to speak her; but as
Wordley would not delay he merely hailed as he passed after this manner:
`Chased in?'
`Yes, sir.'
`A pirate?'
`No doubt of it, sir. He hove in sight from the south at ten, and has chased
me ever since.'
`Do you know how many guns and the weight of metal he carries?'
`He has a forty-two on a pivot mid-ships, six side guns and about fifty men.'
`Very good.'
The next moment we were beyond hearing and merrily dashing on after this
sea-wolf.
CHAPTER II.
The
schooner seeing us pass the merchant vessel and stand out after her,
became satisfied that we not only understood her character but were in pursuit;
she, therefore, as soon as she was satisfied with our intentions braced up sharp
and began to beat dead to windward. She already had had the advantage of
us in the wind, being, when we got outside, full a half mile to windward and
at least three and a half from us ahead.
`If he thinks he can eat his way into the wind and so get clear of us in
that way he is mistaken,' said Wordley, as he took his spy-glass from his eye
after observing the movement. `He finds that we can sail with him on a
bowline
,
for he has not gained a cable's length since we left the merchantman
and now he is going to see what he can do by making a hole with the end of
his jib-boom in the wind's eye! He knew well enough we should have
over-hauled
him before midnight on this tack! I will keep on till I get him abeam
which will be a couple of miles further, and then see what the saucy Dolphin
will do!'
`He lays very close to the wind,' I remarked to Wordley, as I took the
bearings by the binnacle compass!'
`Yes, full five points near!' he answered glancing at the compass. `He has
everything set as flat as the palm of your hand! He looks as if he was going
right into the wind, for see his green flag that flies at the peak! it blows out
strait over the stern!'
`How far is he from us now in a strait line?' I asked.
`About three miles or perhaps two and three quarters.'
`Within reach of your shot?'
`Nonot fired to windward!'
`Then his might reach you here?'
`Yes, if he carried heavy enough metal. But he seems to be more inclined
to run away than to fight.'
`He no doubt knows your superior force in men and guns.'
`Yes, he knows very well who I am. These fellows are well acquainted
with all armed vessels in these seas, and keep knowledge of their movements;
but I think he had lost his reckoning about mine when he run so boldly into
port; doubtless he thought I was on the south side of the island where I was
last week!'
`Have you any idea who he is?' I asked, as we went bowling along, close
hauled, in the course we had laid from first leaving our anchorage, a due W.
S. W. one, the chase in the meanwhile was standing on the starboard tack,
right in the teeth of the wind. If he had kept on his original course we
should now have been nearly in his wake and about a league astern of him;
but his tacking had changed our relative positions and running on opposite
sides of a triangle, we converging towards, and he diverging from,their point
of meeting, there was a place before us when we should be abeam or
opposite
one another, and only a mile apart.
`When we get him in this position I shall open upon him as he passes on
the tack he is on,' said Wordley going forward to the forty-two pounder
which was all prepared for firing, the captain of the gun standing by with a
lighted fuse. `We shall be in this position but a minute or two, and I must
then do what I can to cripple him. And to be sure of my aim I shall back
the fore-topsail, and so fire as steadily from my deck as from a stationary
battery
!'
Taking his place upon the gun, Wordley now closely watched the schooner,
the two vessels rapidly approximating to that point in their diverse courses, as
we sailed on opposite tacks, which would bring us within a mile of each other
for an instant, and then, each passing on, would widen their distance unless
we tacked and stood on the course she was sailing, and so keep abeam of her.
`She is swinging round her forecastle gun,' said Wordley. `She means to
give us a shot, too, as we pass!'
In about five minutes more we came to the position in which we should be
nighest to each other. Wordley sprang from the gun and gave the order to
back the topsail. He then sighted the piece with his eye along the huge tube
of hollow iron, and taking the fuse from the gunner, stood a moment, till the
schooner's headway was deadened and she became stationary, which he
ascertained
by throwing a cork over the side.
I had taken his glass and placed it to my eye to watch the effect of the shot.
I had a full view of the schooner. I could see upon her quarter-deck a figure
moving about with animation, whom I had no doubt was the captain. The
bulwarks and hammock-nettings were high, so that I could overlook only the
caps of the men, but these were very numerous, and were mostly red or blue
caps, with very few tarpaulins among them. I saw two fellows going up the
fore-rigging whose costume was that of the Spanish buccaneer. Before their
long gun the bulwark had been let down inside, giving it a free range in the
direction of our vessel. I could get glimpses of the men hovering about it,
and every sign of an inteation to fire upon us was as apparent as our own
preparations
to fire upon him. The appearance of the schooner was very
picturesque
.
Her immense breadth of canvass compared with the small size of
her hull, as if the wings of a swan had been given to a black-bird. All her
sails, though large, were gracefully cut and symmetrical in their proportions.
Although her tonnage must have been under ninety, yet she carried a
main-sail
heavier than ours, and her foretopsail was very much squarer. She moved
along dark and close to the water, with her long flying-jib-boom projecting
far beyond her bows and almost in a line level with the sea, while her masts of
great length raked aft so that the main truck overhung the taffrail. She lay
upon the water as straight as an arrow, her sharp bows shooting far out and
tapering gradually away into the bowsprit. Low, sharp, rakish, and taunt,
with a cloud of canvass above her decks.
She sailed on, dashing aside the spray from her bows and leaving a long
frothy wake astern that looked like a snow path upon the blue sea.
The sun was just setting as we came abeam of one another, and the
stranger
schooner lay for an instant directly within the circle of his disc, like a
ship stamped upon a medal of gold.
I turned away my eye from the splender of the sight, and at the instant,
Wordley cried with animation,
`Right in the sun's eye!
Fire
!' He had hardly got the words out of his
lips when he applied the fuse himself to the piece and discharged it. At
the same instant the buccaneer also fired. His shot passed with a loud roar
between our masts, and we heard it dash up the spray to leeward, while the
report
of our own gun, was yet ringing in our ears. Wordley threw down the
fuse to seize his glass and spring upon the windlass out of reach of the
smoke which was borne aft by the wind.
`My shot has done good service!' he exclaimed. `It has gone right into
her main-chains, and through and through her, I verily believe! See she falls
off as if there was confusion on board! I should'nt be surprised if I had
wounded her mainmast, for so far as I can judge, the shot must have struck it
between decks. If I had only taken her three feet below, she would have
had work for her pumps. As it is, I must have done her great mischief. Fill
away again, Mr Ferris! I will stand on till she gets a little headway on her
and then tack.'
We closely watched the schooner, Wordley expecting each moment, as he
said, to see her main-mast go by the board; but we were disappointed. The
vessel stood steadily on as before, with every thing drawing, and laying as
close to the wind as possible. We kept our course on the larboard tack,
about five minutes longer, and then tacked and stood after her. We soon
discovered
that we could lay quite as near to the wind as the chase, and with
great nicety in the triming of every sail, and a careful watch of the helm, we
were enabled to come up half a point nigher, that is within about five and a
half points, the schooner laying within six.
`This is a decided advantage, and will by and by bring us up with her,' said
Ferris turning to me.' She will have to tack soon, as she can't run on that
leg more than a mile before she will be in shoal water; if we tack when she
does, we shall by and by work up to her; and at any rate get her within range
of another gun.'
`She must be within range now!'
`Yesbut her stern presents too small a mark at this distance; it dont look
bigger than a buoy,' said Wordley. `We will by and by get her broadside to.
If we could hit her as she is we could rake her, and do the business for her!'
The schooner after running in towards the land on the tack about ten
minutes
longer, put about and stood away on the other tack. We kept on, passed
each other, and a second time exchanged shots, but this time without effect,
both vessels being in motion, although we were nigher to each other then
when we fired first. Our ball passed several feet astern of the chase, while
hers of the same weight of metal, struck the water about a hundred feet from
our larboard quarter, and taking an oblique direction,threw the spray over our
decks in its passage close under the counter. For a moment we believed that
the rudder must have been struck so close it passed us. The jets of water it
cast up, came down upon the deck as if from a fountain.
`That was well aimed,' exclaimed Wordley; and if we had been going three
feet an hour slower than we are, we should have had the best part of our keel
torn off, rudder and all. The speed of the Dolphin has saved her this time!'
We stood on a little further, and then tacked also. The rich bright
twilight that so long lingers after the sun sets, still covered sea and sky with
a brilliant rosy glow, by which the shores and the vessels in the port, and
every object within the limits of our horizon were distinctly visible. The
atmosphere
was perfectly clear and it promised to be a light night! This would
greatly favor us, for Wordley was apprehensive that she might escape him in
the dark, should it cloud. But present appearances indicated a starry sky.
Both vessels were now standing on the same tack, a W. S. W. course, the
chase about a mile and a half ahead, and a third of a mile to windward; but
we knew we were lessening this distance towards the wind every moment,
for our vessel was a fast sailor and her jib-boom never failed to go inside of
whatever it was pointed at.
The twilight deepened slowly into the shadows of the starry evening, and
we were still standing on the same course right out from the land. The
schooner had made no demonstrations of tacking again, although she had been
running a league on this tack, which was also her losing one; her real gain to
windward being on the other or starboard tack.
`That fellow intends to run away from us, be sure,' said Wordley after
watching
her through his glass. He sees we can waltz to windward quite as
delicately
as he can and now he means to run for it across the channel, doubtless
CHAPTER III.
THE DISAPPEARANCE.
to try and reach Cuba under cover of the night. But if I lose sight of him
may I never see Boston!'
The
night set in clear and starry, so that without the aid of the glass we
could distinctly see the grey shape of the pirate schooner flitting away on the
sea about a two miles ahead. We were now exactly in her wake, for while
she had been falling off a little to gain in speed what she lost at windward,
Wordley, was keeping his vessel close hugged on a taut bow-line, thus
losing in speed what he gained to windward. His object was to get once to
the windward, letting the chase run on as she choose, and then give his
vessel
the benefit of a freer sheet, when he was satisfied he would be enabled to
overhaul her by dint of faster sailing. The result will show the wisdom of this
policy. Having at length got the wind of her, the order was given to fall off
a point, and the schooner with every sheet eased and freed from its long
restraint
,
went dashing on with music about her bows, and every strand in her
telling.
Being myself only a guest on board, and non-belligerent, I had nothing to
do but watch the schooner with an occasional peep through my glass, and see
that she did'nt vanish like the Flying Dutchman; but Wordley having also six
men stationed in different parts of the vessel, with orders not to take their
eyes off the misty looking phantom ahead, not even to take time to wink, there
was no danger that she should disappear without due notice given.
`These fellows have so many tricks,' said Wordley, approaching me as I
was watching the swift progress of the vessel through the water, which
glittered
with myriads of phosporescent sparks as if her bows were dashing
through fire instead of water. `They are up to all sorts of tricks! Some of
them will douse their whole top-hamper, yards, spars, and even masts in the
twinkling of a purser's prayers, and one might almost ride over them without
seeing them, they lie so low in the water. Some of them will furl every stich
of canvass and present nothing by which to distinguish her a cable's length
off, even in a night as bright as this. Now that schooner ahead! you can just
see that she is there with the naked eye looking like the ghost of a schooner
faint and flickering. Now suppose she should, while we were looking away for
a moment, suddenly lower her main and fore-sail and jibs, and furl her
top-sails
.
Would it be possible for us to find her by her slender masts? Last
year I was cruising in this same vessel on the south side of Cuba, and leisurly
sailing along the coast a league off, one morning I saw in the offing a little
fore and after making for the shore six miles to leeward of me. I knew there
was a suspected inlet in that direction for the rendezvous of all sorts of
sea-robbers
,
and was steering down that way to take a look in, when I saw this
lugger
.
I put after her with all sail I could carry to cut her off. On finding I
was in chase, she tacked all at once and scampered due south, wing and wing
dead before the wind. Schooners like this sail best on the wind four points
free, and perhaps this little rascal was aware of this fact. I however gave
him chase. Well he run about forty miles to the southward and finding I was
gaining on him gradually but surely, and perhaps not liking to be so far off
from home, he hauled his wind and went off with a free sheet due east,
having
the wind on his larboard beam. This compelled me to haul a little and
cut across the country as they say at home, to meet him. He sailed like a
little devil. The schooner had to make every joint do its work to walk
after
her. Just as night set in I began to gain on her very susceptibly, and half
an hour after sun-set I was within a mile and a half of her. I fired a shot
across her bows, but she paid no attention to it, but still cracked on at a
slapping
pace. I swore then, that as I hoped to see Boston, I'd have that fellow
to breakfast with me in iron mittens. I set studden-sails forward and fore and
main gaft top-sails, sending them up and having them bent for the purpose,
and stationing men on the lookout I soon found I was gaining upon her. It
was about this time in the evening and a clearer night if possible, so that I
was able to see her a mile distant and distinguish her spars!'
`Was she a large vessel of her class?' I asked.
`She was about fifty tons, half the size of the fellow ahead!
`Keep a sharp lookout there, my lads!
`Aye, aye, sir!' answered half a dozen men's voices in a cheery tone.
`Well, I got within a third of a mile of her and having taken a last close
look at her with my glass I walked and placed it upon the binnacle and then
gave the order to stand by and lower away the quarter boat for boarding as
soon as I should come up with her! The coxswain and his crew had hardly
got aft when I cast another glance in the direction of the little rascal who had
given me such a long chase, but I could see nothing of him! Supposing the
man at the helm had let the schooner come up into the wind, I looked at the
compass, and found she was on her course. I then caught up my glass, and
swept the range of horizon and water, but devil a thing could I see of her.
At the same instant three of my men called out in tones of surprise,
`The chase is not to be seen, sir!'
`This was very extraordinary!'
`Yes, and I was perplexed, I assure you. Lest I should run by the spot I
had last seen her in, I immediately brought the schooner to the wind, and
going
aloft with my glass, took a survey of the sea around me. There was
nothing
ing visible. If any thing had been four feet above the water any where near
where the chance ought to have been, it would not have escaped me. After a
fruitless scrutiny of the surface of the ocean, I decended to the deck and
ordered
the vessel to be put away again, and for an hour I went sailing round
in a circle of a mile every man and boy on board on the lookout!
`And you discovered nothing?'
`Not a sign of any thing; and in about an hour and a half after losing sight
of her, I gave the order to put ship about and return to the island, satisfied that
the fellow had foundered!'
`Was it blowing hard?'
`About an eight knot breeze, and not much sea at that! But what
had
become
of him if he had not gone to the bottom?'
`It is surprising indeed!'
`Well I must confess it has puzzled me to this day. My men swore it was
a young Flying Dutchman, and I'm half a mind,' he added laughing, `to be of
their opinion. But let us take a look at our friend ahead and see if he is
likely
to play us any trick.
`The chase is not in sight, sir?' cried an old tar from the fore-riging, using
almost the same words Wordley had repeated in the other case.
`Not in sight?' he exclaimed, hurrying his glass to his eye.
`She has disappeared, all at once sir?' said the man at the helm, for I had
my eye on her and saw her plainly two minutes ago!'
`Well if I dont wish I had never told about that lugger!' exclaimed
Wordley
.
`This fellow has served me the same trick I fear!'
`What, gone to the bottom!' I asked laughing.
`Nobut some internal artifice or other. He is not visible that is a fact, as
I hope to see Boston! Do you make out any thing?'
`I can see nothing,' I answered after a close survey of the sea ahead, with
my glass.
`She bore a point and a half to windward, sir, when I saw her three minutes
ago,' said the helmsman,' for I set her by compass!'
`Then luff that much and stick her dead on to the spot! If she has gone
down we shall find her bones floating about, and if she has only struck her
masts we shall walk right over her hull! This is all of telling about that
confounded other affair!'
The disappointment and chagrin of the brave officer was only exceeded by
his astonishment at this sudden disappearance of the chase. With his glass
at his eye he took a stand upon the gun forward and closely scanned the
surface
of the ocean. He rubbed the lens of his glass at least a dozen times with
the cornor of his silk handkerchief and as many times replaced the instrument
to his eye. But the sight of the vessel did not reward his perseverance.
`We ought to be now in her neighborhood,' he said coming aft. `Now
every man of you open all the eyes you've got, and see with the ends of your
fingers. She
must
be somewhere about here.'
`Have you a blue-light on board?' I asked.
`No, but by the lord Harry, I can soon make something that will answer the
purpose. I have half a score of rockets below, and I will send one of these up
with lighted swab of oakum dipped in tar!'
The idea was no sooner suggested than carried into execution. The rocket
was bound to a spar that projected over the gang-way, and a hairy mass of
oakum, like a Medusa's head, was secured to the staff. A slow match was
placed in the midst of it, and ignited. The rocket was then let off into the air.
The weight of its unusual appendage retarded somewhat its velocity, but it
nevertheless rose boldly skyward, and by the time it had reached its greatest
altitude, the wind of its progress had kindled into a blaze, which
communicating
with the oakum, exploded into a vast mass of the most brilliant light.
`Dont look after the light, but at the sea,' shouted the Captain, who had kept
his eyelids down to a level with the horizon, that he might have the full
benefit
of the reflection upon the surface. It shed abroad far and wide, a wild
glare, lighting up the ocean for a mile around us. Then it began to descend
like some fiery fiend hurled from the skies, and with a loud hiss plunged into
the sea. All was instantly darkdarker than before, to our vision. I felt the
firm grasp of Wordley upon my arm as the light began to fall, and his finger
pointed me in silence to a black mass to windward and
astern
about two cables
length distant. I had hardly caught a glimpse of it when we were in
darkness
.
The glance was so brief that I could not tell whether it was a black
rock, or a vessel's hull!
He sprung to the compass and fixed the bearings of it, and then his noble
voice was heard ringing like a trumpet.
`Ready about! All hands to tack ship! Lively, men lively!'
The crew sprung to their several posts ignorant of the cause of the thrilling
order; yet guessing at the truth. The boatswain's whistle piped loud and
shrill. The schooner's head came up to the wind, her upper sails shivering,
then filled reversed against the mast; and then amid the flying of sheets and
braces, the swinging round of yards and swooping over of booms, she set her
bows the other way and was soon dashing on in the direction in which we had
discovered the dark object upon the water.
`There is no doubt that it is the vessel,' I remarked to Wordley as he took
his station on the weather side of the quarter-deck upon a gun-carriage.
`No. I saw the fellow as plain as I see my hand. He had struck his
top-masts
and taken in every inch of canvass, and lay upon the water drifting.
I dare say he expected he should escape us; and 'fore George! he like to have
done it, for we had passed him without seeing him, if it had not been for the
rocket and its fiery tail. We must keep a sharp look out now, or the fellow
will get off yet!'
A dozen men were on the bows and in the fore-rigging watching the sea,
and in five minutes the cry was
`A sail dead ahead, sir!'
Wordley seized his trumpet and sprung upon a weather gun. There was
none visible.
`To leeward, sir!' called out the Boatswain.
We ran to the other side of the vessel just in time to see dash swiftly past
us, a large fore and aft topsail schooner, steering on the opposite tack, and to
hear a voice from her deck say in a pleasant ironical way
`Good night, gentleman; a pleasant cruise to you!'
The next instant she was nearly out of sight, far astern!
CHAPTER IV.
THE LAST SHOT.
`
If
that is not the schooner may I never see Boston!' exclaimed Wordley,
as soon as he could find words to give expression to his astonishment. Ready
about!'
The next moment we were dashing along on the other tack, and in full
chase. With the glass the schooner was visible like a gray cloud resting upon
the sea. The excitement on board was now intense. The men believed the
vessel to be a phantom, and some roundly swore it was the same slippery
fellow
that had got away from them the year before, the young Flying
Dutchman
!'
Wordley paced the deck a few moments in silence after he had seen that the
schooner was doing her best, and then stopping by me, he said impressively,
`What do you think of all this?'
`That, after he saw the illumination you made, he knew he must be
discovered
and so at once made sail and resolved to pass you boldly, as the only
chance of escaping.
`That is what I think,' he said thoughtfully; `but it is very singular. I am
not superstitious, but to tell you the truth, I begin to think I might as well give
hase to a cloud on the horizon, as to this fellow!'
The light of the binnacle shone upon his face, and I could see, as I looked
at it with surprise, that he was serious.
`There is nothing supernatural in what has occurred!'
`No, nothing yet; but if she don't show us some other trick before long,
may I never see Boston!'
`Most sailors I know, are superstitious, but I have not usually found officers
so,' I remarked.
`Why not officers? we commune night after night, as we pace our lonely
decks; we commune, I say, night after night with the same deep and
mysterious
sea on which we live, and with the same starry or stormy skies above us,
and which is our only roof. Our ears hear the same moanings and whisperings
from the waves and the winds, and our imaginations people the surrounding
air and ocean with the strange forms and flitting shapes! It is no wonder
sailors, I mean by the term both officers and men, should be superstitious.
There is not a man on board but what believes in the Flying Dutchman as
faithfully as he believes in the existence of old Neptune!'
`That is rather equivocal faith,' I said laughing. `Do you mean to say the
men believe that there is such a personage as Neptune!'
`Ask one of them! There is an old man-of-war's man there at the main tack
coiling up the slack. `Come here Jack!'
`Aye, aye sir,' answered the tar crossing the deck and touching his
tarpaulin
.
`Do you believe in Neptune?'
`Do you mean old father Nep with the beard and grains, sir?' asked Jack
respectfully.
`Yes, Jack!'
`Why sartinly, sir, I hopes I do!' responded the tar giving a pull at his
trousers
on either hip, and touching his cap at the same time with a certain
reverence
of manner, as if with an involuntary feeling of respect for the bearded
sea-king.
`Have you ever seen him, Jack?' I enquired.
`That I cant swear to sir, because its not bible proof: but then if I said as
how I had'nt seen him, I believe I should lie!'
`You believe there is such a craft cruising the wide ocean as the Dutchman,
dont you Jack?' asked the Captain after taking a long and steady look at the
schooner ahead, and satisfying himself that she was still visible.
`The Flying Dutchman, sir?'
`Yes, Jack!'
`It stands to reason I does. He has been seen a hundred times,' he
answered
with positiveness. `I have had a glimpse at him twice myself!'
`You have, Jack?'
`Yes, sir, and I knew ship-mates who have had him come athwart their course
as many as seven times in a cruise! I never want to see him, for the ship
that falls in with this crazy craft never brings all her crew safe to port; and if
she meets him thrice she finds the bottom afore her best bower will, that is
gospel!'
`Well Jack, you may go forward and keep a good look out, and tell the lads
there to button their eyes back, for that fellow ahead must'nt give us the slip a
second time!'
`We are gaining on the vessel,' I said as I took up the glass; `I can make
out the spaces between her yards and sails which were blended with them in
a confused mass a few moment ago!'
`You are right. I will train the long gun upon him, now I have him in
range and see if I cant cripple him. He is not more than three quarters of a
mile ahead of us. Hark! Do you hear and see that! It is a pistol that
had been discharged on board of her, by accident, I suppose. The sound was
so clear and distinct that she cannot be so far off! Come forward with me
and I will train the forty two upon her and send him my respects!'
The gun was loaded and then accurately levelled by Wordley upon the
vessel
which was now plainly distinguishable without the glass; and, therefore, it
was evident that we were rapidly approaching her.
`Now I will try whether his sails are made of canvass or of moonlight,'
said Wordley as he took the lighted fuse from the hand of the gunner and moved
it two or three times through the air to brighten the ignited end.
He applied it to the priming and the flashing light of the explosion showed
us plainly the whole proportions of the schooner towards which the roaring ball
of iron was hurled. It was but for an instant,like the transient picture
produced
by a magic lantern. Smoke enveloped us, and our ears, almost deafened
by the report, were bent eagerly to catch any sound from the direction in which
the shot had sped.
`She has got it?' shouted Wordley as a crashing sound accompanied with
cries wild and shrieking was borne to us! `She has got it, every ounce of it,
and much good may it do her. Hark! here that sharp noise? Now listen
for the splash! There it is! One of her masts has gone by the board!'
With the glass I could see that his ear had not deceived him. Her foremast
had fallen carrying with it all the sails over the side into the sea. As soon as
Wordley saw this he seemed a new man! He was all life and gaiety. He
gave his orders with spirit and a cheerful `aye, aye' came back from the men.
The gloom and superstition of his mind as well as of their's vanished, and the
feeling throughout the vessel was one of exhiliration and joyous anticipation.
Crippled as she was, the chase could not now escape us. Each instant we
were expecting a return from her first gun, but as she did not fall off as she
would be compelled, to bring it to bear, it being forward, we supposed she was
unable to do so. But as we came up we could see that she was lying
perfectly
unmanageable upon the water and rapidly falling off from the wind, so
that if we had not luffed she would the next moment have laid broadside to our
course! Wordley grasped his trumpet as we came nearer and sprung upon
the companion-way.
`Have you struck?'
`Yes!' was the answer, but not in the same voice that before had bade us
good night and wished us
bon voyage
so gaily.
`Why dont you lower your main-sail if you can't come to?' he cried as we
went bounding on past his stern, crossing his wake and wearing round upon
his starboard-quarter, for he was now going off before the wind under the
main-sail and gaft-topsail, while his top-mast stay-sail torn away from the fore
mast, was blowing out strait like a streamer, as she was driven helplessly
along
.
`Lower the main-sail to stop her way, and send a boat on board!'
`Aye, sir.'
We were now moving on side by side both right before the wind, which
was the only course the prize could take. To keep from shooting ahead, as
she drove in this way only about four knots, and the wind blew an eight knot
breeze, we had to brail up our fore-sail, drop the main peak, and even let the
fore top-sail drop upon the crosstrees. The distance between us was about
one hundred yards.
Their main-sail came down by the run, and a boat was lowered into the
water
.
It soon approached us and a rope being flung to them from the gang-way
it was soon alongside. A person who stood in the stern, got out and came
upon
deck. Wordley met him at the gang-way, on each side of which stood a
sailor holding a battle-lantern that cast a bright light upon the scene. By
their glare the stranger was distinctly seen. He was a man under thirty years
of age, of the middle height, but a strong frame compact and symmetrical.
His face was either English or American, though his complexion was very
dark. He was dressed in a blue seaman's roundabout but had the air of a
person
superior in rank to a common-sailor. The expression of his face was
singularly
resolute.
`Are you the captain of the prize, sir?' asked Wordley.
`No, sir, only the second in command, answered the man glancing around
upon the group with a cool and observing look.
`Where is your captain?' demanded Wordley quickly. `Why has he not
come on board of me?'
`He was wounded by that last shot of yours, and lies bleeding in his cabin.
But for this we should hardly have struck, but fought it out till one or the other
of us went down!'
`He ordered you to strike!'
`He did, and it is the first time such an order came from his lips,' said the
man with a sort of sad pride in the character of his chief.
`What is the name of your vessel?'
`El Viento?'
`That is The Wind!'
`Yes, `The Wind' is her name!'
`She is well named?'
`Have you brought your papers on board with you?' asked Wordley with
irony. `I suppose they will say that you are from port Westerly, bound to
port Easterly, and that your captain, is captain North wind, and your crew are
a crew of fresh breezes!'
`We have no papers,' answered the man doggedly. `We are what we are
free travellers of the waves!'
`Free robbers rather than travellers. What is your captain's name?,
`Captain Rafael?'
`That man I have heard of before; but it could not be he, for he was shot
in Havana, a year ago! A daring fellow he was!'
The man smiled significantly and said
`My captain is also called Captain Rafael, sir. It is a good name for a free
flag!'
`You are then a pirate?'
`For want of a more courteous term,' answered the man with a smile of
reckless hardihood. `But it is not worth while to be talking here, sir, while
our schooner is going down by the head as rapidly as she can sink.'
`Is this true!'
`Your last shot passed out under her bows a foot below the water-mark.
She was filling when I left her! Our boats too are stove, save the one I came
in!'
`You are confoundedly cool about it,' cried Wordley with angry emotion.
Lower away the boats all! `Lively men! Four men to eachnomore, as
there will be enough to bring back! I see her settling by the head plainly.
Give way towards her, and not let the poor devils perish, for they must live to
be hanged; and I want to see this captain Rafael in person!'
Three boats were now pulling towards the sinking vessel, and in the leading
one stood up Wordley animating his boats'crew. In a few moments she had
struck the vessel's side and he was upon her deck.
`Save yourselves all of you by the boats,' was heard in his commanding voice
She is settling fast and will soon pitch under.'
The pirates sprung for the boats, the love of life overcoming every other
feeling, and soon crowded them. As fast as they came up the side and
stepped
on deck they were ironed and sent below. Wordley came last and aided
by two men lifted the wounded Captain upon deck and had him conveyed to
his cabin, and being himself an excellent surgeon, and his only one on board,
he prepared to examine his wounds, and dress them.
`For,' said he to me, making use of his favorite pharse, `may I never see
Boston if he shant live to be hanged!'
CHAPTER V.
As the schooner was taken and sunk in the Spanish waters, Wordley
resolved
to stand into Havana, and surrender his prisoners to Tacon who was
then governor-general of Cuba. The wounded buccaneer Captain remained
an inmate of the cabin, and as he seemed to be a person of education and
polished
manners, Wordley treated him with great kindness and attention; for
he was not a man to triumph over the unfortunate and guilty.
The appearance of the young man deeply interested us both. He was
about
eight and twenty years of age, with a clear blue eye and fair waving
hair, and a countenance naturally mild; but to which familiarity with stern
scenes had given a character of decision. The wound which he had received
was comparatively slight and did not produce a single complaint. He
remained
reclining upon a setee which Wordley had fitted up for him, with a mattrass
and pillow, and seemed lost in painful thought. At intervals he would raise
his eyes and turn them towards me as I sat reading in the pleasant draft of the
cabin windows. Seeing that he looked as if he wished to address me, I laid
down my book and went to his side. Hitherto he had not made any reply to
any questions put to him, but seemed to desire to be left to himself.
`Can I do any thing for you, senor?' I asked in Spanish.
`You are very kind,' he answered in pure English. `I would like to know
if I am to be taken into Havana?'
`Yes. We are within three hours sail of that Port now,' answered Wordley,
who came into the cabin at the same moment.
The pirate's countenance became very pale, and he appeared to be strug
gling with some strong emotion. With an effort he resumed his composure,
and said
`I would prefer being taken to the States!'
`It matters little whether you end your days at Key-West or in Havana, I
should suppose,' answered Wordley.
`I have reasons for not wishing to be delivered to Governor Tacon,' he said
impressively.
`You should have considered those reasons, senor, before you hoisted the
ree flag!'
He made no answer; but pressing his hand upon his forehead seemed as if
either in mental or physical pain. Wordley was shortly after called to the
deck by his second in command, when the prisoner turning to me said
`I should like to relate to you if you will listen to me, the circumstances
which have brought me into the condition you now behold me. If Captain
Wordley will come into the cabin I should be glad to have him hear what I
have to say. I went on deck and communicated the words of the prisoner, and
Wordley accompanied me below. `My motive in entering upon this
narrative
of the history of the past,' he said after we were seated by his couch, `is
not to excite your sympathy or seek to escape the punishment that is justly
my due! I know that I have incurred the highest penalty of the laws of
nations
,
and I am ready to meet my doom, though I would have chosen death by
the hands of the hangman than that I am destined to suffer!'
`How do you mean?' asked Wordley with surprise. `Tacon never honor's
buccaneers by shooting them!'
No; would that such could be my death? But I am doomed to a more
dreadful end! know you that I have once been tried and condemned for this
very offence against the laws, and that I escaped from the foot of the scaffold
on the morning of my intended execution. Tacon, the Captain-general,
issued
a proclamation offering a large reward for my capture and declaring at the
time that if I were re-taken, I should be broken
daily
upon the wheel till life
was extinct! This is the horrible death that awaits me if I am taken to Cuba.
But I am not a man to supplicate! I have sown and I am willing to reap!'
`Under what name was you sentenced?' asked Wordley with interest.
`Under that of Captain Rafael!'
`Is it possible that Rafael the pirate is my prisoner! Your men refused to
give me any other name for you than `El Capitan!'
`I am the Rafael Mutes,' answered the young man with a flush of pride.
`But you are not a Spaniard? You speak English with too much purity,'
said Wordley.
`I am an American!'
`An American!' we both repeated with surprise, for we had made our minds
from his very fair complexion that he must be a young Englishman.
`Yes, senores, I am an American and a native of Virginia, of what part I will
not now reveal. If you would like to know the events which led to the
present
result I will relate them to you. You will then, perhaps, find that I am
less to blame than I seem; though I do not desire to palliate my conduct!
Circumstances may force men to crime, but the guilt incurred is not lessened
thereby; for death is easier and more honorable than life supported by crime;
and the brave can meet death in a hundred battle fields on the earth, for wars
cease not even among waters!
`My father was a man of fortune, holding a large estate, and the owner of
more than a hundred slaves. I and a sister, two years my junior, were his only
children. At the age of eighteen I was sent from home to a northern
university
,
where I remained until I was twenty-one, when I returned home to find
my father on his death bed. On entering his chamber and approaching his
bed-side he waved me indignantly away and closing his eyes refused to
look upon me!
`Father, my dear father!' I cried rushing forward; `do you not know me!
Do you not hear the voice of your son Rafael?'
`Awayyou are no longer my son!' he cried in stern accents, articulating
with difficulty. I looked at my sister who stood by his pillow, but her silent
glance seemed to reprove me, while she said in an under tone
`Leave the room, I beg of you, brother! Your presence affects him!'
`And why should it?' I cried with indignant surprise. `Is he not my
father
?
am I not his son? Who should kneel by his bedside and close his dying
eyes but his son? There is some horrible mystery here!' And thus
expressing
my emotion, I caught my father's hand and pressed it to my lips and
kneeling
by his side, with tears implored his blessing and his forgiveness if I had
done any thing to incur his displeasure.
`The words `False and degenerate son!' escaped brokenly from his lips,
and after a brief struggle for breath he resigned it forever. I rose to my feet
and stood gazing upon him with horror. My sister flung herself shrieking
upon
his body, and overwhelmed with horror at the words that rung in my ears,
I rushed from the chamber.
What had I done? What had brought upon me the dying anger of my
father? I was unable to answer the question. I put to myself a hundred
times as I paced madly up and down the long piazza. At length I became
more calm and resolved to seek my sister and learn what had produced this
change in my beloved father's manner towards me; for I had always loved and
honored him, and he had been proud of my filial affection for him. My
conscience
accused me of nothing! I found my sister Anna weeping in her
chamber
!
`For God's sake, dear Anna, what does all this mean?' I asked as I entered
the room; `I have not been at home an hour and I am received like an enemy!'
`I am surprised you should ask brother,' she said with a cold look.
`And you my foe too!' I cried in a sort of despair. `What horrible mystery
is this? What have I done? Speak! You
shall
answer me and not fly from
the room as if I were a monster! It is enough for me to have my father's
dying
curse ringing in my ears, without your hatred, sister! Why am I
recieved
and treated thus?'
`Do you mock me! My father's displeasure was just! What you have
recieved
you have only merited!'
`His displeasure just! Merited what I have received,' I repeated in
astonishment
.
`Three years I have been absent from home during which time,
I have acted honorably in all my intercourse with the world. I have not in
that time seen you nor my father but once, two summer's ago, when you came
to visit me for a few weeks and I went to Saratoga with you. Then we
parted
as father and son, as brother and sister should part. Since then I have
not met my father to incur his displeasure. What dreadful crime am I
supposed
to be guilty of?'
`You cannot deceive me into the belief that you feel now differently from
what you felt when you wrote your strange letters! I look upon you as an
enemy to my father and to me, Rafael, as well as a foe to your native state,
and a rebel against its laws!'
`Are you mad?' I asked with astonishment. `I must believe that my
father's reason wandered in his dying moments and that his death has turned
your brain, Anna!' I said kindly; for I had no suspicions of the astounding
crime of which I was supposed to be guilty.
`No, Rafael,' she answered me disengaging her hand and going out of the
room, `I am not deranged, neither was our father, as you well knew I have
loved you Rafael as a sister until the developments of your true character
made it known to me that you were unworthy of the affection of a true
daughter
of Virginia. Recreant to your native land! Defiler of her good name!
An enemy to her institutions! A rebel and a conspirator how could I
acknowledge
you as brother? How did you expect your father would, on your return,
recognise you as a son?'
I was utterly confounded. I gazed upon her with a surprise too great for
utterance. Conscious that I had been innocent of every act unworthy a gentle
man or a true son of Virginia, it was easier to believe that she was deranged
then to accuse myself of any unworthy deed.
`Anna,' I said following her into the hall and speaking as soothingly as it
was in my power to do; for I was excited by grief and surprise.
`I cannot talk with you, Rafael,' she answered me with an air of haughty
displeasure; and passing into a room opposite, she closed the door and turned
the key on the inside.
I stood petrified with amazement. At this instant a footstep on the gallery
caused me to turn. I beheld with pleasure a gentleman who had been my
tutor and my sister's before I entered college; and who had for a year or two
after I had left continued to instruct Anna. He was a New England man
about
thirty years of age, with an intelligent countenance, and a manner and
smile extremely prepossessing. He had been the past year post-master in the
town near which we lived, and to which all our letters came. He also was a
lawyer having been engaged in reading laws while he was tutor in my father's
family.
On seeing him, I hastened towards him with my hand extended, for I had
always liked the man, and to do him justice he was a very thorough teacher.
He advanced also reaching forth his hand he warmly shook mine, expressing
his gratification at seeing me returned; but at the same time manifested his
sorrow at the death of my father.
I felt relieved to find one person to meet me with cordiality; and as soon as
we had interchanged the first words of meeting, I implored him to tell me if
he knew, what fearful mystery was hanging over me!'
CHAPTER VI.
THE CONSPIRACY.
`
The Tutor
regarded me with looks of surprise when I had made
this demand of him to explain the mystery hanging over me,' resumed
Rafael after a few moment's silence, during which he seemed to suffer
equally
from mental and physical pain.
`Do you not know what I mean, Mr. Whanley?' I asked. `But no, you
cannot or you would treat me as they have treated me! You would scorn me
too, for what God knows!'
`Scorn, Rafael,' he said. `I have only regarded you with love and
affection
.'
And he took my hand and pressed it with friendly warmth.
`Then let me tell you all,' I said overcome by his kindness.
`I knew you have suffered a great loss in the death of your father,' he said,
`and your emotion I can easily account for. His death has been expected the
last ten days; though you were not written to as you were expected home
daily! Did you get here to see him die?' he asked earnestly.
`Come with me into this room,' I said drawing him into the library and
closing
the door! `Mr Whanley I then began, I have seen my father die! I flew
to his bedside to receive his dying blessing, but he refused to look at me! he
refused to speak to me except in accents of horror and hatred! Thus he died
denouncing me as a false son! Before I could learn from him the cause of
this conduct towards me, his spirit had flown forever! I then sought my
sister
to learn from her what had happened to bring my father's hatred upon my
head, and I found her equally cold and hostile. Dark hints and fearful
suspicions
was all I could obtain from her! You appeared and met me as they
should have met me, kind and friendly and full of affectionate pleasure! I am
willing to attribute something to my sister's grief; but behind all, there is
some dreadful mystery!
What
have you heard against me?' I demanded with
tears in my eyes.
`Nothing, Rafael,' he said, `I know nothing against you! Your relation
surprises me! I deeply sympathise with you! If you desire it I will
endeavor
to ascertain from your sister what has occurred?'
`No, no,' I answered; `I will see my sister and know all from her own
mouth! She will not refuse to tell me. I shall demand the knowledge as a
right!'
`Such was my reply to Mr Whanley,' continued the young Captain of the
schooner; `and leaving while he went voluntarily, as he said, to superintend
the laying-out ceremonies for the dead and arrange for the funeral, I hastened
to my sister. I did not find her in her room, and seeking her, discovered her
in the near verandah and Whanley just about to take her hand and whisper to
her. On seeing me he retired suddenly, while I could not but feel surprised
to find him in that part of the house when I supposed him in the other wing in
which my father had died. I observed he seemed embarrassed and my sister
also. But I did not suspect him then of an evil toward me.
`I have sought you, Anna, I said, to have an end put to this suspense.
Whatever
I have done to bring upon my head the displeasure of my father, is
equally known to you, as is apparent from your reception of me. Now tell me
at once what I have done? You have thrown out terms that to me are
incomprehensible
.
My conscience acquits me of all wrong to him or you!'
`I dont know,' said my sister to me in reply, `which most distresses and
amazes
me, your guilt or your hypocricy, in the face of your very letter to dare
to deny your course!'
`What letters? what course?' I asked with surprise. `For God's sake, Anna
tell me what I am charged with?'
`I will answer you by your own written words,' she answered, `if, as it
seems, you have so thoroughly became lost, as not to suspect your present
conduct
base and guilty. If you have become so deformed as not to suspect
yourself
,
I will show you your own letters!'
As she spoke she led the way to the room I had left and going to a desk
unlocked
it and from a package of letters, took out one and handed it to me,
saying
`You will not have the daring, brother, to deny writing that?'
`No,' said I as I saw that it was a letter addressed to her in my
handwriting
and mailed at New Haven, from which all my letters had been written for
the last three years.
`And, yet you ask why my father died without looking kindly upon you, or
why I receive you as I have done!'
`Then what can I have written in this letter?' I exclaimed unfolding it with
trembling hands and opening it. My eye run hurriedly over the page, and I
was instantly struck with an expression that I knew I had never penned. This
led me to begin and read the letter, when I saw with astonishment that I was
not the author of a single line! The hand-writing was a perfect imitation of
my own and deceived my own eyes, but the language of the letter showed me
that it had never been penned by me. I read paragraph after paragraph with
horror and indignation and revenge at my heart. I will repeat to you the
letter
,
senors! It was written about two months previous, and dated at College,
and mailed at the same Post Office. It began `My dear sister Anna,
`I have at last made up my mind to communicate to you the change in my
views and opinions in relation to our southern institution. Brought up
surrounded
by slaves, and from earliest infancy, seeing them in a position
inferior
and servile, I naturally conceived that this was their natural condition. I
have, however, recently changed all my views and opinions. I have learned
at the north the great truth that all men are born free and equal! I have also
learned to regard Africans as men! I have learned to view not only the
traffic
in slaves as wicked and unjust, but also to regard as wicked and unjust,
the holding in bondage the children, however remote the generation, of slaves
so stolen and trafficked for? I have, in a word, become an abolitionist! But
this name so defamed and ignominous at the South, is here in this atmosphere
of freedom and human liberty, a distinction of honor. I am proud of the
appellation
!
and I look forward to the time when I shall hail every southern man
and woman as an Abolitionist! To the emancipation of the poor slaves I shall
henceforth devote my heart and hand, my purse and influence! In this
benevolent
enterprise, I know you will join me, my dear sister! I have no time to
write more now; but in a subsequent letter I will enter more fully into the
subject
,
and unfold before you the arguments which have made a northern-man
of me. I shall also write to my father!
Your affectionate brother,
Raphael
.'
`The whole of this letter,' I exclaimed to my sister as soon as I could
command
language, `is a vile forgery! I never penned it in my life!'
`But there is the Post-mark! and the writing is your own! `Nay, even the
seal!' she said looking at me with surprise.
My earnestness impressed her; but still she looked suspicious and taking
out another letter, handed it to me saying, but with a doubtful air,
`Nor this either? Is not this your writing?'
`It resembles mine! I should say it was mine,' I answered, `but for what I
have just now read.'
`Read this also,' she said with emphasis.
`I will repeat to you, gentlemen, what I read; for the words are grown upon
my memory. This letter was addressed not to my sister, but to my father.
The accurate resemblance of the hand-writing to my own, confounded me.
It began: `My dear father,
After mature deliberation I have come to the determination of writing to you
upon a subject which engaged my thoughts and influenced my actions.
Educated
as I was, till I left home the idea that there was a moral wrong in
holding
our fellow-beings in slavery never occurred to me. As a matter of
reflection
it never entered my mind. I regarded bondage as the natural condition
of the negro and never troubled myself to examine into the wrongs or rights
involved. But I have had my eyes opened by mingling with the society of
northerners, to whom slavery is detestable, and who regard slave-holders with
abhorrence. From them my mind has became enlightened, the veil of
darkness
and ignorance has been removed, and the atrocity and wickedness of the
whole system has been revealed to me in the clearest light. I am now a man
and a freeman! I can now point without a blush to the memorable opening of
the incomparable Constitution which declares `all men born free and equal!'
Convinced of the crime of slavery, I cannot consistently act otherwise than
in harmony with my principles! I have written to you the change in my
feelings
and views as an act of duty. I feel I shall incur your displeasure, but I
cannot withhold the fact from you, that I have become what I am! In a
word, sir, I feel that I can no longer make use of the fruits of the slaves toil!
and I candidly tell you that when my property comes into my hands, if I
cannot
prevail on you sooner to do it, I mean to free all the slaves that fall to me.
I may be impoverished, but this will not alter my opinions; and I shall have
the proud satisfaction of having done my duty. In a few days the course of
my collegiate studies will close, and I shall return to my paternal home.
There I hope to convince you by irresistable arguments that you are in the
sight of God and all true men guilty of oppression and `of withholding from the
laborer his hire.'
Your affectionate son,
Rafael
.'
When the young buccaneer chief had ended the recital of this letter, he
threw himself back upon his pillow for a moment, and covered his face with
his hands, as if renewing again the bitterness of the hour when he first read it
in his sister's presence. At length he resumed:
`This letter is also false and forged like the other?' I cried to Anna, after
I had mastered the strong emotions of anger and surprise that seized me on
reading the second letter and discovering the conspiracy against me. My
sister regarded me for some moments steadfastly, and then said impressively,
`Do you speak truly, brother?'
`As I have a Creator and am to be judged by him, these letters are false!
I never wrote a line of them.' I answered.
`Then you deny the principles! You are not an Abolitionist?' she cried.
`No. I am a Virginian and a true friend to my native state! Some one
has forged these letters to you and my father, for what end God knows! I am
as I was when I left Virginia!'
`And have you not received any letters either from my father nor myself in
reply them?' she asked firmly.
`Not one!' I answered. `I have never got a letter alluding to these letters,
and if you received them it is a wonder I did not!'
`It is very extraordinary. We both wrote you!
And you replied to both of
us!
'
`Replied?' I exclaimed thunderstruck.
`Yes. Here is your reply to mine, and also to father's!'
`And she placed two letters in my hand,' continued the buccaneer. `I read
them and found indeed that they were mostskilfully executed replies, in which
I defended my course and hinted at becoming a public declaimer against
slavery
from the forum.
`Then you are innocent. Rafael!' cried my sister. `You are innocent of
all!'
`Yes. I have been the victim of some dangerous enemy!'
`Then you have not thought of organizing a secret club of young men in this
State for the purpose of creating a revolution, overturning the government of
the State and establishing one upon the same basis as the States of New
England
?a
club called `The Brothers of Liberty?'
`Never!' I answered. `Has such a charge been made against me too?'
asked overcome with surprise.
`Yes.' She answered. `Six days ago my father received an anonymous
letter informing him that you were the leader of such a secret party, and that
you were in correspondence with some young men in the county whom your
letters had brought over to your principles. This intelligence was credible
after
the letters we had received and it so distressed our father that his sudden
illness may be owing to it; for although a month ago he had a paralytic attack
he was getting over it. But this letter confirming his worst fears, was a severe
shock to him and he sunk under it!'
`I am not surprised now,' I answered, `at my father's treatment or yours.
These letters explain all! I must now find out who my enemy is? Do you
suspect any one?'
`No one,' was her reply.
`Nor did I,
then
,' said the buccaneer fixing his eye upon us with deep
feeling
;
but I was not long in ignorance of my enemy, or of his motives, as you
shall learn.'
CHAPTER VII.
THE VISIT.
`The direction in which my thoughts turned to discover who had written
these letters,' said the buccaneer, `was the northern university which I had just
left. The letters were mailed there, and it was my impression that they were
written there. I therefore began to revolve in my mind any enemy I had there
who would be likely to endeavor to do me an injury in this manner. But I
could fix suspicion upon no one. Whoever he was, I was at least satisfied that
he knew me intimately; was familiar with my style of writing as well as a
perfect
imitator of my penmanship; and that he knew when I wrote to my parents,
and when they wrote to me; for he had evidently prevented my father's and
my sister's letters from reaching me.
`But I will not detain you, gentlemen,' said the wounded man, with
recapituation
of the process by which I sought to trace these letters to the hand that
wrote them. Neither my sister nor myself were able to fasten suspicion upon
any one. She now believed me innocent and we were reconciled, and it would
have given her as much joy almost as it would have given me, to have
discovered
the author of these letters. The day of the funeral of my father came
and we followed him to the grave. On our return to the house the will was
opened in the presence of my father's attorney, a justice of the peace, Mr.
Whanley, the Tutor, and a few relatives who remained.
The will was read aloud and I found to my confusion and dismay that I was
disinherited. Yes, gentlemen, my father acting under the influence of those
accursed letters had cut me off from my inheritance and made my sister the
sole heir to his property, and Mr. Whanley his executor! The clause
affecting
me ran thus:
`Whereas my son Rafael having become an enemy to his native State, an
alien from his father's affection, and a traitor to every honorable feeling, by
conjoining
himself with the Abolitionists of the north, I have thought it best to
devise
and bequeath all my possessions real and personal to my beloved
daughter
Anna. In so doing I do not any injury to my son Rafael aforesaid,
inasmuch
as he has in his letters to me solemnly declared not only all slavery,
crime, but those who partake of the fruits of the slaves' labor criminals. I
leave him therefore to the innocence he covets!'
`When I had recovered a little from the consternation and anger which the
reading of the will had produced, I openly and publicly declared before them
all that I was not an Abolitionist, that my father had been deceived, and that
I was as true a son of Virginia as I had ever been! But my protestations of
innocence were all in vain towards changing the opinion formed by these
standing
around me! They shrunk from me with horror and words of bitter insult
rung in my ears.
`I followed my sister to her room and accused her of having influenced
my father's will in her own behalf; but with tears she not only protested her
innocence, but also convinced me of her entire ignorance of the tenor of the
will until she had heard it read.
I now questioned her closely with reference to the particulars of the
reception
of the forged letters. She said they were brought to her and her father
from the Post Office, by the servant who usually went to the office. I then
examined
carefully the New Haven post-mark upon them, comparing it with that
on some letters which I knew were genuine. After a careful comparison, I
was satisfied that they were in a very slight degree dissimilar; but the
difference
was so trifling, that no one causually observing them would have
suspected
the forgery. The difference consisted in the cross-bar to the letter H, the
bar being a heavier mark on the seal stamp, than on the false one.
`I showed this to my sister, and we began to endeavor to fasten suspicion
upon the author of these forgeries. But all our conjectures were vain. I
resolved to seek Mr. Whanley, and lay the whole matter before him. This
course my sister also advised. I found him at his office, and opened the
subject
to him as I would have done to a brother. But first I learned from him
that he had been in ignorance of my father's intention to appoint him executor
and knew nothing of it until the will was opened. If I had known he said
taking
me by the hand, `I should positively have refused to act as executor to a
will which disinherited you!'
I told all to him and read the letters at the same time declaring my
innocence
.
He betrayed the utmost surprise and promised to use every means
to make known the perpetration of this forgery. I left him perfectly satisfied
of his friendship and confident in his integrity. But all my efforts to divine
the author of my wrongs was unavailing. As it regarded my property I did
not so much have cause to regret being disinherited as my sister declared she
should share with me equally in the patrimony. By Whanley's suggestion, I
resolved to visit New Haven, and get there if possible some clue to the author
of my wrongs. I departed from home two months after my father's decease
on this mission. I reached the place of my destination and there remained
several days trying to find some clue to my secret foe. Application with the
letters in my hand to the Post-master confirmed my suspicion that the stamp
was forged! Nor had such letters been mailed on that day. I was convinced
that I must seek my calumniator nearer home. Then gradually for the first
time, suggested I know not by what train of thought, the idea of Whanley
being
the man forced itself upon me. I rejected the suspicion in the beginning,
and tried to throw it off, but it at length pressed upon me so strongly, that I
resolved to return home at once and charge him with it!
On reaching my father's house I found Whanley in possession! He met
me in the same fawning manner as before, but I rejected his hand; for I had
worked myself up, by thinking of circumstances, to the conviction that
Whanley
was the man who had injured me. He saw by my manner at once that I
was not in humor with him, and being guilty he divined the cause.
`Why this coldness?' he asked looking very pale.
`Why are you here?' I demanded.
`As the executor of your father's estate, I am here to protect and take care
of the house!'
`Where is my sister?' I demanded.
`I have sent her to a boarding-school!' he answered
`By what authority?' I demanded.
`That of her guardian!' he responded firmly.
`Where is she?' I asked fiercely.
`That I shall not reveal at present!' was his reply. `I am not to be bullied
by a beggar!' was his rejoinder.
`I seized him by the throat and charged him with being the author of the
letters! By my own slaves was he rescued and I turned out of my father's
house!' But I will hasten to the end of my story of wrongs. That night I
received intelligence from a faithful negro, who came to the tavern whither I
went, that there was an armed party coming to apprehend me as an abolitionist
and the leader of a secret abolitionist club which I was said to be forming in
the country. He brought me a horse and entreated me to escape. I did so!
I mounted him and fled, not for fear, but that I might have time and
opportunity
for revenge. I was the next day but one in Richmond, when I learned
that I had been out-lawed by a proclamation of the governor and a reward
offered
for my apprehension? I fled also from Richmond sailing away in a brig
bound for the West Indies. For three years I was a wanderer and I became
a pirate, not from choice, but from circumstances. The brig was shipwrecked
and myself and one seaman were driven ashore upon an island which was the
resort of pirates. I remained with them three years by compulsion, for each
day I was burning with vengeance against Whanley whose conduct was to
me, a convincing proof of his guilt, and I was filled with anxiety about my
sister. At length the captain of our schooner, of which I was made second in
command, was killed, and I succeeded him. The very day I had the command,
I steered for the United States and entering the mouth of James River by
night ascended and anchored within a half of a mile of my paternal home.
In disguise I went ashore the next morning and after an hour's cautious
observation
of the premises, I saw Whanley come forth, mount a saddle horse
which had once been my own, and attended by a servant ride away, After
he had got out of sight, I advanced to the door, being dressed as a common
sailor, and asked of a negro whom I well knew, `who lives there!'
`Mr Whanley, massa!' was his reply.
`Is Miss Whanley here?' I asked with doubt and fear.
`Massa mean mistress,' he replied. `She Missy Whanley once, but she
marry massa Whanley and now she mistress! Dare she be now?'
`As he spoke, I saw appear on the gallery a lady whom I with difficulty
recognised
as my once lovely sister! I saw at a glance that she was wretched.
I approached her and touching my hat asked her if she would let me speak to
her alone, as I had a message from her brother! At this allusion to one whom
she supposed dead, she uttered a cry of joy that told me she loved me still!
She led me into the library where we had had our first interview and there, I
made myself known to her! On recognizing me, she clung around my neck
and with tears of joy welcomed me to her heart's embrace. I asked her if she
was indeed married to Whanley?' She looked alarmed as if she feared he
would hear, and then answered `Yes, and I have reason to weep tears of
blood! Know you, Rafael, that we have both been his victims! It was he
who wrote those lettersfor I have discovered all,
all
wrote them that my
father might will to me the whole estate! His object in my being sole
inheritor
was to get the whole into his possession by marrying me. He it was who
forged those letters and poisoned our father's mind, and he it was who drew up
the will! This fearful accusation of himself, I had heard him make over
and over again in his troubled sleep, and at length when I was convinced of
its truth enough to charge him with it, I did so. He confeseed it all, but
threatened my life and that of my infant's if I dared reveal it to a human soul.
He put me to school in a retired village, and under circumstances so
unpleasant
that I was wretched. He came to see me and told me if I would marry
him, he would remove me and make me happy in the world of fashion. I
consented
,
and we have been married two years! Every day he renews his
horrid
threat to me! He brought me a paper containing a notice of your death,
but which he must have forged. This was that I might believe I had no one to
appeal to! It was he who got out the writ of arrest against you, and induced
the governor to offer a reward for your apprehension!'
`Judge my feeling, gentlemen,' said the buccaneer Captain with strong
emotion
,
`judge my feelings on hearing this revelation of crimes on the part of
a man we had trusted as a brother. But I will not describe what I
experienced
.
I talked with my sister and told her what I should do. I told her that
she must remain passive, and let no feeling for the father of her child lead her
to interfere with my vengeance. I then left her!
`That night as soon as it was dark, I landed with my men, surrounded the
house, took Whanley and carried him on board my schooner. I secured him
in the cabin and immediately got under weigh. I left behind the following
note for my sister.
`Dear Anna, From this hour enjoy your estate and live for your child
You will never see your husband more. Within three days you will be a
widow
!
I free you forever from a tyrant and consummate, at the same time, my
own vengeance! Be happy, and ere long we shall meet again!'
`After we had got to sea I went below and made myself known to Whanley
I never witnessed fear and horrow like his! I accused him of his crimes, made
him confess them in writing, and then with my own hands, fastened the rope
to his neck by which he was the next moment swinging at the yard arm!'
CHAPTER VIII.
THE LEAPER.
When
the young buccaneer captain had ended this part of his narrative, he
remained a little while deeply moved by his feelings; and then proceeded:
`Thus was I
avenged!
I and my sister, for the great wrongs we had
received
at the hands of this man. As circumstances and not choice had led me to
embrace the life of a pirate, I now resolved to quit the career I had entered
upon
,
and on my vessel reaching Cuba, I resigned the command to my lieutenant
and took passage in a merchantman for Virginia, determined henceforward to
dwell on my paternal estate with my sister.
At first I kept private, but gradually ventured abroad into society, and made
myself known. But I first sent to the governor the written confession made
by Whanley, and received from him the assurance that I should not be
molested
as he had been long satisfied that I was innocent of the crime alleged
against me, and that no secret society had been organized for liberating the
slaves. I did not of course tell the governor that I had hanged Whanley. I
represented to him that I had made him confess, and that after the confession
he had left the country.
`Rumors, however, soon became rife that Whanley had been dealt foully
with, and murdering him, that I might possess the property. The excitement
against me grew each day stronger; but as I knew his death could not be
proved against me, I resolved to brave it out. One evening with this spirit, I
attended a public assembly at Richmond, when I was recognised by a
gentleman
present as having boarded, with my schooner, a vessel in which he was
passenger, and plundered her. He openly charged me with piracy and drew
upon me the indignation of all present; for already suspected, it was easy for
men to believe any thing against me. Officers were sent for to arrest me, and
I had to fight my way out of the hall to escape.
`I now knew that as the supposed murderer of Whanley, and as a
recognized
pirate, I should be hunted down and that the old story of my conspiracy
against
my native State would be revived, and that under all these charges I
should be crushed. So I spurred to my sister's abode, briefly told her of my
danger, collected what money and valuables I could, resumed my sailor's garb
and left the house by one gate, just as my pursuers rode into the yard by
another. I galloped along the river-road for several leagues until I fell in
with a brig just getting underweight from a tobacco plantation landing. The
brig was bound for Mobile. I turned my horse loose and was received on
board of her as a seaman.
The eighth day out as we were passing the `Double-Headed Shot Keys' a
schooner hove in sight to windward and bore down upon us. As she came
nearer our captain felt alarmed and said he feared she was a buccaneer; for
at that period as well as now there were many such vessels cruising in these
waters and about Cape St. Antonio. This remark drew my attention towards
her more particularly and borrowing the glass from the mate, I looked at her
and confirmed a suspicion I had already conceived. As she came nearer and
before she hoisted a green flag, I saw that she was
my schooner
. She fired a
gun over us and finding he could not escape the Captain hove to. The
schooner
was laid along side and my lieutenant who was a young Spaniard of a noble
family, at the head of a score of men leaped on board, cutlass in hand,
shouting
upon all to submit. I met him and called him by name. He started back
with surprise and pleasure, and then dropping his cutlass embraced me. In
a few words I told him why I was there. He insisted on my resuming the
command, and as I was once more a wanderer and an outlaw, I yielded to his
wishes and the intreaties of the men, and resumed my command. Going on
board I dressed myself in an uniform I had left behind me; and when I came on
deck thus attired, and resuming authority over the pirate crew, the completion
of the astonishment of the captain and people of the brig may be conceived.
`Instead of being plundered and their vessel burned, I gave the captain
permission
to go on his voyage unharmed; for this was the condition upon which
I consented to accept the command.
`I was now once more an outlaw! I neither defend nor palliate my course.
Persecutions and unmerited disgrace had rendered me indifferent to results.
I knew that the world looked upon me as a conspirator and as a murderer!'
`And did you not hang Whanley?' asked lieutenant Wordley with a look
of surprise.
`Yes. But I regard not that act as a dishonorable one. It was a just act of
retribution upon one who had shortened my father's days, poisoned his mind
against
me, exiled me from my native state, and wrested from me my rightful
possessions and good name! It was no murderit was justice! The laws
of the land could not reach him; and rather than he should live, I slew him!
I do not regret it! Whanley is dead, but I was only the instument of justice
human and divine in punishing him! But I care not now to excuse any thing
I have done;' he added with a gloomy air. `I am willing to abide the issue!'
`The day after I took command of the schooner, we fell in with a vessel
bound to Cadiz. We boarded her, were resisted, and many were killed on both
sides. She was very richly laden and after I had taken out her specie, I let
her go on her way. But, instead of proceeding on her voyage, she put back
to Havana and reported what had happened. Three armed vessels were
immediately
despatched in three different directions, and by one of them I was
captured, and taken into port. My schooner was anchored under the guns of
the Moro, and my lieutenant and I were thrown into one of its dungeons,
while my men were placed in the city Carcel. We were brought to trial and
Alvaro and myself were condemned to be shot with forty three of my men, the
ensuing morning. We were conducted from the citadel to the place of
execution
.
It was a level green plateau overhanging the harbor. The height was
forty feet. My schooner lay anchored so near we could have conversed with
any one upon her decks. As we approached the verge to stand in line, we
were unbound and told to form in front of a double file of soldiers. As I found
myself free from the cords, I bounded suddenly forward, and leaped out into
the air beyond the precipice. The waters closed over me, and being a good
swimmer, I continued to move rapidly beneath the surface towards the schooner
and rose to take breath some distance from the spot. When I did so, I saw
the air filled with the bodies of men, flying and plunging around me into the
flood. Animated by my example Alvaro had followed me; and the men seeing
this, broke from the line of death, and in a body rushed to the precipice and
made the leap after him. For a moment the soldiers were confounded by this
movement, but recovering their self-possession they began to pour in their fire
upon the last of the number, so that out of the leapers three struck the water
dead men. The air now rung with the shouts of the officers, and the ringing
of musketry. As I looked up, I saw the verge of the cliff lined with the troops
who were firing into the water in vollies. Raising my voice, I encouraged my
men and directed them to swim to the schooner, but to keep under the surface
as long as possible at a time. I soon reached my vessel and drew myself up
over her bows by the cable, which I instantly cut, setting her adrift. The men
one after another came up and climbed on board. Alvaro did not appear, and
was no doubt struck by a bullet. Out of forty three men, I counted thirty two
that came on board. In less than tour minutes, under the fire of musketry from
the cliff, I had sail on the schooner, and in seven minutes we were out of reach
of musket shot; but five more of my men were killed upon the deck. Beyond
the Moro a Spanish frigate lay at anchor, and she opened upon us; but as the
wind was fair and fresh, we were under her fire not one minute and a half, she
being unable to bring her guns to bear except in a direct line. Yet one of her
shot struck us carrying away our stern-davits, shivering the main-boom, and
killing one man. In thirty minutes from the time we got under sail, we were
in the offing and bowling along with a flowing sheet, at the rate of eight
knots!'
`That was a most daring escape;' said Wordley. `I have heard of it
before
.
I arrived in Havana three days after it, when it was the only topic of
conversation in all circles. You then are Rafael
El Saltador
, or `the Leaper'
as men have since denominated you?' added Wordley, gazing upon him with
manifest admiration in his looks.
`Yes, I am Capitan Rafael,' answered the buccaneer with a smile like pride
visible in his eyes. `A large reward was now offered for my apprehension,
and it was proclaimed by public manifesto that if re-taken I should be broken
p the wheel! It is the prospect of this fearful death that induced me to
say that I would rather take my trial in the States. But I am willing it should
be as it is! With this wound in my side I have the key to my own life, and at
my will can let it forth!'
The peculiar significance with which he spoke, could not but make a painful
impression upon us. We were all three silent for a few moments. Wordley
was deliberating and struggling with a desire to save him. But his duty to
his countryto societyto himself, was a safe-guard to any weakness of the
heart.
`Why did you remain then in these seas, surrounded by such perils?' he at
length enquired of him.
`These waters were my cruising ground, and I had no wish to cruise in any
others. Perhaps, too, I was influenced by a spirit of bravado and defiance, I
knew that vessels were abroad in search of me, but I had made up my mind
not to be taken! I should not have surrendered now but to an Americana
countryman, and having received as I believed a mortal wound; and besides
my men urged it, hoping that some good fortune might favor their escape a
second
time; for it requires great resolution for men quietly to sink in their own
vessel. Chains with a faint hope of life, are easier conditions; and so we are
your prisoners instead of being in the bottom of the ocean with our schooner!'
`You were bold to follow that merchant ship into the very port of Key-west,'
remarked Wordley
`Daring is the only virtue in our profession. All our deeds are bold of
necessity
.
Our existence is each moment a risk! Our lives are every hour at
stake! For some weeks past I had fallen in with nothing of value and my
men were becoming dissatisfied; and I therefore resolved to take the ship if
possible. I had chased her eighteen hours, and to have her to enter her port
after I had got within gun-shot would have created a mutiny among my men.
They were, however, by no means reluctant to put about when they discovered
an American cruiser lying in the harbor. Fortune favored you and I am a
prisoner
in your hands!'
He concluded his narration in these words uttered with an air of dignified
resignation
,
and then sunk back upon his pillow exhausted by pain and the fatigue
of speaking. It was clear by Wordley's countenance as he rose to go on
deck that he would have set him at liberty had he the descretionary power.
`It is hard for that brave fellow to die on the wheel,' he said to me as I came
up and stood by his side. `He has been the victim of circumstances rather
than a depraved man! It is a pity he should have hung the villian Whanley,
when he might have done his business by a duel. I delieve if he had taken a
different course and brought him to the bar of justice, he could have convicted
him, as well as cleared his own reputation and kept his hands from blood!
Well, he is a guilty man now, however, and I suppose deserves his fate! But
it is a great pity, for he is a noble fellow and has the heart of a lion!'
The same evening we anchored in the harbor of Havana, and Wordley,
ordering
his cutter, pulled ashore and waited upon the Captain general to inform
him of his capture of the notorious
Rafael, El Saltador
.
CHAPTER IX.
THE PRISONER.
The
rumor of the capture of the noted Capitan Rafael soon filled the city
and created universal satisfaction, especially among the mercantile community,
whose commerce upon the ocean this daring young buccaneer had so long
interrupted
.
On Wordley's return from the Palacio of the Captain-general, he
was accompanied by a party of the palace-guard whom the governor had sent
for the purpose of escorting our formidable prisoner to the city Carcel. At
Wordley's suggestion they brought a litter, as Rafael was quite to ill to
walk. Nevertheless, when the officer took possession of him he had him
heavily ironed; a broad iron collar being fastened about his neck and secured
by a padlock behind; manacles placed upon his wrists and fetters upon his
ancles, from which passed a heavy chain five feet in length connecting them
with the iron collar about his neck, and linked also to the hand-cuffs.
When Rafael had been thus ironed, he took leave of us with calmness, and
said to Wordley,
`Fare well, sir! To-morrow I shall be in the other world! We shall meet
no more in this. Accept my grateful acknowledgements for your humanity
and kindness to me. Farewell and prosper in your noble profession. What
I
have done, I have done. I must bear the ignominy of my own acts.
He was borne upon the litter into the barge along side and it pulled to the
shore surrounded and followed by at least a hundred boats filled with those
whom the knowledge of the circumstances had drawn to the scene. When
he landed the crowd upon the Quay was so dense that the soldiers from the
Plaza had to open a passage in the rear to the water for the escort to pass up
from the landing.
Towards sunset we also went on shore and walked up to the American
coffee
house. There we learned that El Saltador as every one called him,
was to be broken on the wheel at nine o'clock the next morning in the Campo
of Public Execution's outside the walls not far from the alameda.
`Poor fellow,' ejaculated Wordley; `let us go and see him and endeavor
to cheer him in his last hours. He has been a great criminal but there is
much to admire in his character. He is not wholly depraved. I will wait
on the governor and get permission to see him and also endeavor to have his
chains removed. Let us go at once to the Palace!'
On reaching the entrance, Wordley gave his name to the sentinel at the
gate who despatched it by a sergeant to the Captain-general. In a few
moments
he returned and asked us to follow him. We ascended the spacious
stair-case of the Palacio to an upper corridor at the opposite side of which was
a spacious hall where we found the vice-gerent of Cuba promonading with
two Spanish officers dressed in gorgeous uniforms. On perceiving Wordley,
His Excellency recognized him and advanced three or four steps to meet him.
`Ah Senior Capitan Americano,' he exclaimed with a smile of great
satisfaction
.
`I am glad to see you. I was about to send a message on board
your vessel of war inviting you to do me the honor to dine with me to-morrow.
You have done me and all men great service in capturing this buccaneer
whom we have so long desired to take, and the highest honors we can render
you will poorly express our pleasure and indebtedness!'
`I have but done my duty as an officer in the service of my country,'
answered
Wordley. `Has your Excellency yet spoken with the prisoner?'
`No! He lies in the dungeon of the condemned in chains! I will see him
when he is led forth to execution!'
`Is your Excellency aware that he is wounded?'
`Yes. Is it severely?'
`So much so, that without being chained there is little fear that he will
escape
.
I should esteem it a favor if your Excellency would give orders to take
off his chains and let the last hours of his unhappy life be lightened!'
`I fear the man too much, Senor Capitan, not to take the greatest
precautions
against his escape. He is a daring man, and would escape where no
other man could! Pardon me, but I must decline acceding to your humane
request
.
I am resolved this man shall not elude me. He shall be broken on the
wheel to-morrow as I live! Once I have condemned him to be shot; a second
time I have condemned him to the wheel! He shall not have the hair's breadth
of a chance given him for a
third
condemnaton and sentence. Twice
condemned
is enough! What other favor have I it in my power to grant you?'
`Permission, with my friend, to visit Captain Rafael in his cell!'
`That I will grant and will myself accompany you,' answered Tacon with
animation. I would like to see him. Come in and take coffee with me, and
after a cigar we will proceed to his prison!'
We accompanied the Captain-general across the noble hall and being
joined
by the Spanish officers were issued by a slave into a cool verandah
opening
upon an orange and lemon garden where coffee and cigars awaited us. It
was just after sunset, and the mellow radiance of the golden twilight
pervaded
all the atmosphere. The air was laden with the fragrance of innumerable
flowers, and the branches of the orange-trees were filled with singing birds,
and fountains cooled the air! The hum of the busy city, scarcely penetrated
to this retired spot where the energetic Captain-general of Cuba threw off the
cares and restraints of his responsible position.
Coffee of delicious fragrance was handed to us by slaves dressed in muslin
trousers and jackets, and others followed with
semillas
, a hard sweet buscuit,
and another with cigars on a silver salver, and another with a silver lamp.
We did not take our seats around a table but upon settees and ottomans placed
around the verandah in the coolest situations. The governor and Spanish
officers smoked and drank coffee, whiffed and sipped alternately with infinite
gusto. We, however, contented ourselves with taking the cigars after coffee.
If any thing could have surpassed the delicate flavor of the coffee, it was the
flavor of the cigars. Out of Havana such luxuries as the governor regaled us
with are unknown. They were truthfully named `Regalias.'
While we were smoking Wordley enquired what was to be done with the
pirate-crew which had been removed from the schooner of war to the city
prison
.
`They are to be hung to-morrow,' answered Tacon firmly. `All of them but
eleven are those who escaped with El Saltador. But I shall hang them all
alike
without trial, for these men should not have been in such company if they
expected any clemency.'
`No pirate deserves to live an hour after his capture,' said one of the
Spanish
officers. `Taken under a piritical flag is enough to hang them without
trial! They are all too inhuman to live!'
`Not so, Don Ferdinand,' said the Captain-general smiling. `So long as I
have a neice I shall remember that but for one of these pirates she would have
been lost to me forever!'
`How was he of service to her, your Excellency?' asked Wordley with true
Yankee inquisitiveness.
`In this way,' answered the Governor lighting a third `Regalia.' Three
years and a half ago my brother died in Spain. He was a widower with only
one child, at the time of his death. This child, a lovely girl of thirteen, he
bequeathed to my paternal care and affection. I sent for her to come to
Cuba
,
and in a Spanish brig of war that was soon to sail. The day before she
was to embark, the brig of war wrecked, with half the vessels, in the port of
Cadiz, upon the quay. My neice, the Donna Leonor, anxious to reach me,
embarked
in a merchant vessel which, when within four days of Havana, was
chased and captured by a pirate. They plundered the vessel of the most
valuable
articles they could lay their hands on, and the buccaneer captain struck
with the beauty of Donna Leonor determined to take her and her servants on
board of his vessel, leaving the ship to proceed on her voyage. He was only
prevented from carrying the fancy into execution by his lieutenant, a very
young man, and as Donna Leonor describes, very handsome and noble, who
interfered to protect her at the risk of his own life, threatening to shoot his
captain
dead upon the spot if he dared to lay his hand upon her. The young
officer
was seconded by several of the pirates whom he called around him, and
the buccaneer captain sullenly yielded to the control of a spirit more
indomitaable
than his own. In a word Donna Leonor was saved the ignominy and
wretchedness of becoming a Corsair's bride by the young man's daring; and
the vessel was suffered to proceed on her voyage bringing me my loved niece
in safety. She now never hears of pirates being taken that she does'nt ask
me to be sure before they are shot that `her preserver,' as she terms the bold
young pirate, is not one of them!'
Wordley and I looked at one another during this recital and exchanged
looks of surprise and of mutual intelligence. Facts precisely like these Rafael
had related to us subsequently to the general narrative he had given of his
life; and had stated that they occurred when he was acting under his first
captain. He did not, however, say who the young maiden was, whom he had
protected; and it is probable that her rank was concealed from him by the
Spanish
Captain, lest large ransom should have been demanded. If Rafael had
known the young girl he had protected to be the niece of the Captain-general,
it would have been natural that he should have made known to him his
services
when he was formerly his prisoner. But then, his pride was so high, it is
doubtful whether he would have condescended to take advantage of such a
circumstances towards mitigating his sentence.
`I have heard Captain Rafael relate a similar incident in which he was an
actor, your Excellency,' said Wordley. `I should not be surprised if he should
prove to have been the gallant man who saved your niece, Donna Leonor!'
`Was Don Rafael second in command at the time, and was it about three
years and a half ago?'
`Yes, your Excellency, so he informs us!'
`Did he tell you the name of the ship on board which the young girl he
protected
was passenger?'
`The Carlos III.'
The very same vessel in which Donna Leonor came!' exclaimed the
Captain
general with surprise. `Can it be possible this is the same person?'
`It must be without question,' answered Wordley.
`I trust it will not prove so,' answered his Excellency with a look of anxiety.
`I should be sorry to execute a man who has done me and mine such good
service! But we will ascertain this!'
The Captain-general then gave orders to have `El Saltador' brought, in chains
as he was, into his presence. The day had now closed and numerous wax
candles
supplied the loss of day-light. While the captain of the body-guard was
despatched for the prisoner, His Excellency went out and soon returned
leading
in a lovely girl of seventeen, with dark Castillian eyes and hair, and a form
of bewitching symmetry. He presented us to her as the Donna Leonor, his
neice. In a few moments the clinking of chains and the tramp of the heavy
feet of the soldiers who bore the litter, announced the approach of Rafael.
They entered and deposited their burden. Rafael reclined upon his elbow
and looked calmly around. He was very pale but his countenance was firm
and composed. It wore a slight air of surprise as if wondering why he had
been brought into the presence of Tacon.
`Leonor,' said the Governor, `look well at the prisoner, and '
Before he could complete what he was about say, she, who had been all the
while attentively regarding him, exclaimed
`It is
he!
'
`Who, Leonor?'
`My preserver! Oh, uncle spare him, if he is thy prisoner!'
`It is Rafael El Saltador! Shall I spare
him!
'
`El Saltador!' she exclaimed with a start of alarm.
`It is he? Is he the same who saved you from the Pirate chief?'
`He is!' she answered earnestly.
The expression of Rafael's face showed plainly that he recognized her, but
he remained silent, waiting the issue, and gazing on her with a look of
gratitude
and surprise.
CHAPTER X.
THE WHEEL.
The
emotion of Donna Leonor on recognising her protector and beholding
him in chains before her, rendered her insensible to the consideration that he
was the notorious buccaneer `El Saltador,' whose deeds were the theme of
every tongue. She approached him and laying her hand upon his, while her
dark, beautiful eyes were swimming with tears of pity and gratitude
`Noble Don Rafael, I thank Heaven for giving me an opportunity of
expressing
to you my gratitude, though I am grieved that it is under circumstances to
yourself so unfortunate. The good deed you performed for me, will never be
obliterated from my memory. You saved my life and honor!
I
will save
yours!
Then turning from him, she approached her uncle the Captain-general who
had been regarding her with a countenance full of perplexity.
`Uncle, I ask of you the life of your prisoner?' she cried with eloquent
earnestness. `Do not refuse me! I know that he has forfeited it! I know
that he is twice condemned! I know that he has done evil! But spare him
for my sake! But for him I should have been lost to you forever?
But for him, instead of the happiness I enjoy in your presence and under your
paternal protection, I should have been wretched and degraded! Let not the
preserver of my life die!'
`I know that something is due to him, Leonor,' answered the
Captain-general
looking very much troubled, his feelings evidently struggling between his
duty as a man and as a ruler, with a strong bias towards clemency. `But if
I pardon Don Rafael how shall I appease the public? They will demand his
death! They wait to witness his execution! I dare not disappoint them
without sufficient reason; and the fact that he rescued you, my niece, I fear
will weigh little with them at such a time! I fear El Saltador must die!'
`Nono! He must not die!' she cried fervently. It shall never be said
that you were insensible to the dictates of generosity, you, who owe so much
to Don Rafael; that is if you value
me
, whom he has preseved to you!'
`Do not plead for me, noble signora,' said Rafael with a glowing cheek
and a sparkling eye as if his heart swelled with gratitude to her, for her
interest
in his fate,`I have been condemned and am ready to meet my fatethat
is diethough I would not die on the wheel!'
`You shall not die, Don Rafael! My uncle will pardon you! He is too
noble to take the life of one who saved mine!'
`I will mitigate his sentence, niece,' answered the Captain-general. `He
shall not be broken on the wheel. I will substitute instead the soldier's
death!'
`He must
not
die,' answered Leonor with firmness. `I will protect him
with my life! If it is of no value to other's it is to him, and as he has
preserved
it he shall have the protection it can afford him!'
As she spoke the spirited and generous Spanish girl left her uncle and
placed herself by the side of the prisoner. Her uncle regarded her for some
moments with surprise and seemed to be endeavoring to discover whether
there was not a feeling in all this conduct deeper than mere gratitude. At
length his mind seemed to be made up. He approached Rafael and said with
dignity
`Young man, for the sake of my neice I pardon you! It shall never be said
of me that I sacrificed the life of own who saved the life of my neice!
Remove
his chains!'
This order was given to the Captain of his guard who stood near, and a
smith being sent for, his irons were soon taken off and borne from the
apartment
.
With a slight exertion Rafael raised himself from the litter and
seizing
the hand of Leonor kissed it with an air of grateful respect. She threw
herself upon her uncle's bosom and wept for joy, overwhelming him with her
thanks and praises for his goodness.
`There is a condition with your freedom, senor,' said the Governor turning
to Rafael; it is that you leave the island within three days, and pledge me
your honor as a man, for I believe you will regard sacredly such a pledge, that
you will never return hither. The penalty for appearing here again be
assured
will be death?
Rafael on hearing this condition, glanced at the beautiful, earnest face of
Leonor and then answered sadly
`I give your Excellency the pledge you solicit!'
But he looked as if banishment from the presence of the lovely girl, were a
punishment scarce less than death. Between her and him there was apparent,
to an observing eye, a tender sympathy of interest already awakened, which
time and opportunity would surely ripen into love. Leonor looked as if she
would rather the condition had not been annexed; but she was silent.
`You have a wound,' said the governor to the young man! My surgeon
shall attend to it! You shall be removed to a suitable apartment, where you
will be held as a prisoner until a Spanish vessel, now in port suils for the
United
States on board which I will have you secretly conveyed. The
knowledge
of your pardon shall remain a secret from the multitude!'
`How will you prevent their knowing it?' asked one of the Spanish officers
with a look of surprise.
`I shall find a way,' answered the governor dryly.
Rafael after his chains were removed, getting energy from the sight of the
lovely girl whom he had served and whom he never forgotten, and inspired by
the pardon he had so unexpectedly obtained through her intercession, felt
stronger in heart and body, and able to sustain himself without the litter.
Leaning on the arm of one of the soldiers, he was conducted from the room.
As he left he bowed to each of us and waved his hand in forewell. Leonor
stood pale and silent regarding him attentively, and with all her woman's soul
in her eyes. Their eyes met for an instant, and as the electric arrow darts
from cloud to cloud, so love's arrows darted from heart to heart in that brief
glance, and it needed not a magician to tell me two souls were made
one!
CONCLUSION.
The
ensuing morning we went early on shore, curious to witness how the
populace would conduct on learning that they were to be deprived of the
gratification
of seeing `El Saltador' broken upon the wheel. We expected to
find the streets filled with an excited and incensed multitude. But to our
surprise we found that there had been no public notice given by the governor
of the pardon of Rafael. The whole city was in motion towards the Campo
and all was animation with the prospect of the expected spectacle. We
joined
the moving throng towards the place of execution, desirous of seeing how
they would bear the disappointment, and prepared to behold some fearful
commotion
as the result of Tacon's clemency.
On reaching the `Campo' which was a waste field outside of the walls, we
found several thousand persons already assembled, and the gallows upon which
the crew of the captured pirate vessel were to be hung, erected, and the rack
or `wheel' placed near it. The former was full forty feet in length, it being
constructed for the purpose of hanging the whole party at once.
`The people will be content with the hanging,' said Wordley; `and
perhaps
glutted with the death of the pirates, will not feel their disappointment
in not having the additional spectacle of Rafael broken upon the wheel!'
While he was speaking the pirates were escorted to the gallows by a
battalion
of troops, and after the priests had performed the last offices of religion,
they were executed.
But it was plain from the indifference with which this sight was witnessed
by the Habaneros that they were reserving the edge of their appetite for the
less ordinary execution upon the wheel. The execution of `El Saltador' was,
besides, worth more then that of three score pirates to witness; and for this
spectacle all were now on the eve of the most exciting expectation.
`I dont know how the Captain-general will appease this curiosity,' observed
Wordley as we overheard the remarks of the spectators to each other in
anticipation
of the fearful `afterpiece' to the tragedy they had just witnessed.
Every eye had been fixed upon the wheel and all at once a deep murmur swept
over the multitude like the wind stirring the leaves of a forest.
`There he is!' flew from tongue to tongue. Could it he possible? The
executioner was actually conducting a man upon the platform of the rack.
From the distance at which we stood we had no doubt but that it was Rafael.
We exchanged remarks of surprise at the Governor's perfidy, and turned away
with horror from the painful scene!
The fearful wheel began to do its work. The air rung with two or three
piercing shrieks! The whole multitude was as silent as the ocean in a calm.
Suddenly, up went a great outcry that seemed to shake the Heavens. It was
a cry of deep satisfaction and ferocious triumph. The vengeance of the
people
were satisfied, and their appetite for the horrible sated. The vast mass
separated into fragments amid the thunder of cannon and the martial sounds
of music, and poured back again into the streets of the city.
When we reached the Polacio, Wordely said that he would go in and learn
why the Captain-General should have acted so deceitfully; for we deeply
regretted
Rafael's terrible end.
The governor met us in the corridor. He advanced towards us smiling.
Wordley returned his smile with a cold, severe expression.
`Were you at the execution, Senores?' he asked.
`Yes, but ' began Wordley, with a tone of indignant emotion.
`I see that all is right, then! for by your looks you come to accuse me of
dishonoring my word!'
`Most certainly I do!' answered Wordley, firmly.
`If you have been deceived then all has gone well, and I have no fears
from the people. If you think you have seen Don Rafael broken on the
wheel they will make oath that
they
have seen him executed!'
`I do not understand, your excellency,' said Wordley, with surprise.
`Come with me!' he said, with a peculiar manner.
We followed him along the corridor. He threw open the door of an inner
room, and to our amazement we beheld Rafael reclining upon a sofa and
looking
very much improved in appearance and as sound in limb as if he had
never been near wheel or rack.
`There you see, Senores sits, El Saltador,' said the Captain-General,
smiling
.
`He who was broken on the rack was a condemned criminal, who was
to have suffered next Thursday. It was necessary for the peace of the city
that some one should die upon the wheel, and so I anticipated this criminal's
day of execution. I had him clad in `El Saltador's garments, and as his eyes
were bandaged the deceit could not be easily detected, especially as no one
was suspecting such a thing as a substitute. You see I have appeased the
people, saved Don Rafael and kept my own honor!'
A few words will now complete the story of the Twice condemned. The
third day after the Execution of the pirates, Rafael was conveyed on board a
Spanish brig which an hour afterwards set sail bound for New Orleans. As
she passed near our quarter on leaving the harbor Rafael waved his hand in
adieu; and then turning his face towards the city, and with his eye probably
fastened upon the roof of the palace which held the lovely Spanish maiden to
whom he owed his life, and with whom he had left his heart, he remained in
this position until distance rendered his person no longer distinguishable.
From that period there has been no further intelligence of him. The
Captain-General
was soon after superseded and returned to Spain with the lovely
Donna Leonor who bore with her to the golden vales of Castille a sad and
gentle memory of the youthful buccaneer whose life she had restored to him
for her own.
THE END